Utah statutes.
15-9-119.   Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.
The provisions of this chapter governing the legal effect, validity, or
enforceability of electronic records or signatures, and of contracts formed or
performed with the use of such records or signatures conform to the
requirements of Section 102 of the Electronic Signatures in Global and
National Commerce Act, Pub. L. No. 106-229, 114 Stat. 464 (2000), and
supersede, modify, and limit the Electronic Signatures in Global and National
Commerce Act.
